North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-21 Equipment of Vehicles

39-21-01.
When lighted lamps are required.

Subject to the exceptions for parked vehicles, every vehicle upon a highway within this state must display lighted headlamps, taillamps, and illuminating devices as required in this chapter for different classes of vehicles as follows:

At any time from sunset to sunrise, and every farm tractor upon a highway within this state at any time from a half hour after sunset to a half hour before sunrise;

At any time when it is raining, snowing, sleeting, or hailing or during other adverse driving conditions and these conditions do not render a person or vehicle on the highway clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] ahead; or

At any other time when visibility is impaired by weather, smoke, fog, or other conditions, or when there is insufficient light to render a person or vehicle on the highway clearly discernible at a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] ahead.

Stoplights, turn signals, and other signaling devices must be lighted as prescribed for the use of these devices.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1965, ch. 282, § 1; 1979, ch. 418, § 5; 1979, ch. 430, § 1; 1979, ch. 431, § 1; 1987, ch. 464, § 3; 1993, ch. 395, § 1; 2011, ch. 289, § 1.

39-21-02.
Visibility distance and mounted height of lamps.

Whenever requirement is hereinafter declared as to distance from which certain lamps and devices must render objects visible or within which such lamps or devices must be visible, said provisions apply during the times stated in section 39-21-01 in respect to a vehicle without load when upon a straight, level, unlighted highway under normal atmospheric conditions unless a different time or condition is expressly stated.

Whenever requirement is hereinafter declared as to the mounted height of lamps or devices it means from the center of such lamp or device to the level ground upon which the vehicle stands when such vehicle is without a load.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-03.
Headlamps on motor vehicle.

Every motor vehicle must be equipped with at least two headlamps with at least one on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which headlamps must comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in this chapter.

Every headlamp upon every motor vehicle must be located at a height measured from the center of the headlamp of not more than fifty-four inches [137.16 centimeters] nor less than twenty-four inches [60.96 centimeters] to be measured as set forth in subsection 2 of section 39-21-02.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 2.

39-21-04.
Taillamps.

Every motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer and pole trailer, and any other vehicle which is being drawn at the end of a train of vehicles, must be equipped with at least one taillamp mounted on the rear, which, when lighted as hereinbefore required, must emit a red light plainly visible from a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the rear, provided that in the case of a train of vehicles only the taillamp on the rearmost vehicle need actually be seen from the distance specified. Every such above-mentioned vehicle, other than a truck tractor, registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1964, must be equipped with at least two taillamps mounted on the rear, on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, which, when lighted as herein required, comply with the provisions of this section.

Every taillamp upon every vehicle must be located at a height of not more than seventy-two inches [182.88 centimeters] nor less than fifteen inches [38.1 centimeters].

Either a taillamp or a separate lamp must be so constructed and placed as to illuminate with a white light the rear registration plate and render it clearly legible from a distance of fifty feet [15.24 meters] to the rear. Any taillamp or taillamps, together with any separate lamp for illuminating the rear registration plate, must be so wired as to be lighted whenever the headlamps or auxiliary driving lamps are lighted.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 3.

Collateral References.

Liability of motorist colliding with person engaged about stalled or disabled vehicle on or near highway, 27 A.L.R.3d 12.

Lack or insufficiency of parking lights, contributory negligence, 61 A.L.R.3d 13.

Failure to dim or deflect lights on parked vehicle, contributory negligence, 63 A.L.R.3d 824.

39-21-05.
New motor vehicle to be equipped with reflectors.

Every new motor vehicle hereafter sold and operated upon a highway other than a truck tractor must carry on the rear, either as a part of the taillamps or separately, two or more red reflectors, meeting the requirements of this section, except that vehicles of the type mentioned in section 39-21-08 must be equipped with reflectors as required in applicable sections.

Every such reflector must be mounted on the vehicle at a height not less than fifteen inches [38.1 centimeters] nor more than sixty inches [152.4 centimeters] measured as set forth in subsection 2 of section 39-21-02, and must be of size and characteristics and so mounted as to be visible as required in section 39-21-11.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 4.

39-21-06.
Stop lamps and turn signals required on new motor vehicle.

A person may not sell, offer for sale, or operate on the highways any motor vehicle registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1964, unless it is equipped with at least two stop lamps that are in good working order when lighted, are mounted on the rear on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and meet the requirements of section 39-21-19 and this section, except that a truck tractor manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1964, must be equipped with at least one stop lamp meeting the requirements of section 39-21-19.

A person may not sell, offer for sale, or operate on the highways any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer registered in this state and manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1952, unless it is equipped with electrical turn signals in good working order which meet the requirements of section 39-21-19. This subsection does not apply to any trailer or semitrailer of less than three thousand pounds [1360.78 kilograms] gross weight.

A stop lamp on a vehicle must be located at a height of not more than seventy-two inches [182.88 centimeters] nor less than fifteen inches [38.10 centimeters] from the ground.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 5; 2013, ch. 308, § 1.

39-21-06.1.
Additional lighting equipment.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped with one or more backup lamps either separately or in combination with other lamps, but the backup lamp or lamps may not be lighted when the vehicle is in a forward motion.

Any vehicle may be equipped with one or more side marker lamps which may be flashed in conjunction with turn signals or vehicular hazard warning signals.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 431, § 6.

39-21-07.
Application of succeeding sections.

Those sections of this chapter which follow immediately, including sections 39-21-08, 39-21-09, 39-21-10, 39-21-11, and 39-21-12, relating to clearance and marker lamps, reflectors, and stoplights, apply as stated in said sections to vehicles of the type therein enumerated, namely passenger buses, trucks, truck tractors, and certain trailers, semitrailers and pole trailers, respectively, when operated upon any highway, and said vehicles must be equipped as required and all lamp equipment required must be lighted at the times mentioned in section 39-21-01, except that clearance and side marker lamps need not be lighted on any said vehicle when operated within any municipality where there is sufficient light to render clearly discernible persons and vehicles on the highway at a distance of five hundred feet [152.4 meters].

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-08.
Additional equipment required on certain vehicles.

In addition to other equipment required in this chapter, the following vehicles must be equipped as herein stated under the conditions stated in section 39-21-07:

On every bus, truck, trailer, or semitrailer there must be the following:

On the rear, two reflectors, one at each side, and one stoplight.

A trailer or semitrailer which is not so loaded or of such dimensions as to obscure the stoplight on the towing vehicle, need not be equipped with a stoplight.

On every bus, truck, trailer, or semitrailer eighty inches [203.2 centimeters] or more in overall width there must be the following:

On the rear, two reflectors, one at each side, two clearance lamps, one at each side, and one stoplight.

On the front, two clearance lamps, one at each side.

On every truck tractor there must be the following:

On the front, two clearance lamps, one at each side.

On the rear, one stoplight.

On every pole trailer there must be the following:

On the rear of the pole trailer or load, two reflectors, one at each side.

In addition, on pole trailers exceeding three thousand pounds [1360.78 kilograms] gross weight, there must be on each side one side marker lamp and one clearance lamp which may be in combination, to show to the front, side, and rear.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-09.
Color of clearance lamps, side marker lamps, backup lamps, and reflectors.

Front clearance lamps and those marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the front or on the side near the front of a vehicle must display or reflect an amber color.

Rear clearance lamps and those marker lamps and reflectors mounted on the rear or on the sides near the rear of a vehicle must display or reflect a red color.

All lighting devices and reflectors mounted on the rear of any vehicle must display or reflect a red color, except that the light illuminating the license plate must be white and the light emitted by a backup lamp must be white or amber.

Any person who violates this section must be assessed a fee of ten dollars for each offense.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1989, ch. 463, § 6.

39-21-10.
Mounting of reflectors, clearance lamps, and side marker lamps.

Reflectors when required by section 39-21-08 must be mounted at a height not less than fifteen inches [38.1 centimeters] and not higher than sixty inches [152.4 centimeters] above the ground on which the vehicle stands, except that if the highest part of the permanent structure of the vehicle is less than fifteen inches [38.1 centimeters] the reflector must be mounted as high as that part of the permanent structure will permit. The rear reflectors on a pole trailer may be mounted on each side of the bolster or load. Any required red reflector on the rear of a vehicle may be incorporated with the taillamp but must meet all the other reflector requirements of this chapter.

Clearance lamps must be mounted on the permanent structure of the vehicle in such a manner as to indicate its extreme width and as near the top thereof as practicable. Clearance lamps and side marker lamps may be mounted in combination provided illumination is given as required herein with reference to both.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 7.

39-21-11.
Visibility of reflectors, clearance lamps, and marker lamps.

Every reflector upon any vehicle referred to in section 39-21-08 must be of such size and characteristics and so maintained as to be readily visible at nighttime from all distances within six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to one hundred feet [30.48 meters] from the vehicle when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps, except that the visibility for reflectors on vehicles manufactured or assembled prior to January 1, 1970, must be measured in front of lawful upper beams of headlamps. Reflectors required to be mounted on the sides of the vehicle must reflect the required color of light to the sides, and those mounted on the rear must reflect a red color to the rear.

Front and rear clearance lamps must be capable of being seen and distinguished under normal atmospheric conditions at the times lights are required at a distance of five hundred feet [152.4 meters] from the front and rear, respectively, of the vehicle.

Side marker lamps must be capable of being seen and distinguished under normal atmospheric conditions at the times lights are required at a distance of five hundred feet [152.4 meters] from the side of the vehicle on which mounted.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 8.

39-21-12.
Obstructed lights not required.

Whenever motor and other vehicles are operated in combination during the time that lights are required, any lamp need not be lighted which, by reason of its location on a vehicle of the combination, would be obscured by another vehicle of the combination, but this does not affect the requirement that lighted clearance lamps be displayed on the front of the foremost vehicle required to have clearance lamps, nor that all lights required on the rear of the rearmost vehicle of any combination must be lighted.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-13.
Lamp or flag on projecting load.

Whenever the load upon any vehicle extends to the rear four feet [121.92 centimeters] or more beyond the bed or body of the vehicle there must be displayed at the extreme rear end of the load, at the times specified in section 39-21-01, a red light or lantern plainly visible from a distance of at least six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to the sides and rear. The red light or lantern required under this section must be in addition to the red rear light required upon every vehicle. At any other time there must be displayed at the extreme rear end of a load a red flag or cloth not less than twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] square and so hung that the entire area is visible to the driver of a vehicle approaching from the rear.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 9.

Collateral References.

Load projecting beyond rear or side of motor vehicle or trailer, liability for injury or damage caused by collision with portion of, 21 A.L.R.3d 371.

39-21-14.
Lamps on parked vehicle.

Whenever a vehicle is lawfully parked upon a street or highway during the hours between a half hour after sunset and a half hour before sunrise and in the event there is sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] upon such street or highway, no lights need be displayed.

Whenever a vehicle is parked or stopped upon a roadway or shoulder adjacent thereto, whether attended or unattended, during the hours between a half hour after sunset and a half hour before sunrise and there is not sufficient light to reveal any person or object within a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] upon such highway, the vehicle must be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a white or amber light visible from a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the front of the vehicle. The same lamp or at least one other lamp must display a red light visible from a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the rear of the vehicle, and the location of the lamp or lamps must always be such that at least one lamp or combination of lamps meeting the requirements of this section is installed as near as practicable to the side of the vehicle which is closest to passing traffic. Local authorities may provide by ordinance that no lights need be displayed upon any motor vehicle when parked upon a highway where the speed limit in effect does not exceed thirty miles [48.28 kilometers] per hour in accordance with local ordinances or where there is sufficient light to reveal any person within a distance of two hundred feet [60.96 meters] upon such highway.

Any lighted headlamps upon a parked vehicle must be depressed or dimmed.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 10.

39-21-15.
Lamps, reflectors, and reflective materials on farm tractors, farm equipment, and implements of husbandry.

Every farm tractor, self-propelled unit of farm equipment, or towed implement of husbandry, manufactured or assembled after January 1, 1980, must at all times, and every farm tractor, self-propelled unit of farm equipment, or towed implement of husbandry must, when operated upon the highways of this state during the times mentioned in section 39-21-01, be equipped as follows:

Tractors and self-propelled units of farm equipment must be equipped with two single-beam or multiple-beam headlamps meeting the requirements of section 39-21-20 or 39-21-22; provided, that a tractor or self-propelled unit of farm equipment which is not equipped with an electrical system must be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a white light visible when lighted from a distance of not less than one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the front of the vehicle. Every tractor and self-propelled unit of farm equipment must be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a red light visible when lighted from a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the rear of the vehicle. In addition, every tractor and every self-propelled unit of farm equipment must be equipped with two red reflectors visible from all distances from six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to one hundred feet [30.48 meters] to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps.

Every towed unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry must be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a red light visible when lighted from a distance of one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the rear or two red reflectors visible from all distances within six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to one hundred feet [30.48 meters] to the rear when directly in front of lawful lower beams of headlamps. In addition, if the extreme left projection of a towed unit of farm equipment or implement of husbandry extends beyond the extreme left projection of the towing tractor or vehicle, the unit or implement must be equipped with at least one amber lamp or reflector mounted to indicate as nearly as practicable the extreme left projection and visible from all distances within six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to one hundred feet [30.48 meters] to the front when illuminated by the lower beams of headlamps and at least one red lamp or reflector so mounted and visible from the same distances to the rear.

The lamps and reflectors required by this section must be so positioned as to show from front and rear as nearly as practicable the extreme projection of the vehicle carrying them on the side of the roadway used in passing the vehicle. If a farm tractor or a unit of farm equipment, whether self-propelled or towed, is equipped with two or more lamps or reflectors visible from the front or two or more lamps or reflectors visible from the rear, the lamps or reflectors must be so positioned that the extreme projections both to the left and to the right of the vehicle must be indicated as nearly as is practicable. If all other requirements are met, reflective tape or paint may be used in lieu of the reflectors required in subdivision b.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 11; 2021, ch. 283, § 13, effective August 1, 2021.

39-21-16.
Lamps on other vehicles and equipment.

Every vehicle, including animal-drawn vehicles and vehicles referred to in subsection 4 of section 39-21-46, not specifically required by the provisions of this chapter to be equipped with lamps or other lighting devices, must at all times specified in section 39-21-01 be equipped with at least one lamp displaying a white light visible from a distance of not less than one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the front of the vehicle, and must also be equipped with two lamps displaying red light visible from a distance of not less than one thousand feet [304.8 meters] to the rear of the vehicle, or two red reflectors visible for distances of one hundred feet [30.48 meters] to six hundred feet [182.88 meters] to the rear when illuminated by the lower beams of headlamps.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 12; 2003, ch. 317, § 7.

39-21-17.
Spot lamps and auxiliary lamps.

Spot lamps. Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two spot lamps and every lighted spot lamp must be so aimed and used so that no part of the high-intensity portion will strike the windshield, or any windows, mirror, or occupant of another vehicle in use.

Fog lamps. Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two fog lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] nor more than thirty inches [76.2 centimeters] above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands and so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light to the left of the center of the vehicle shall at a distance of twenty-five feet [7.62 meters] ahead project higher than a level of four inches [10.76 centimeters] below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes. Lighted fog lamps meeting the above requirements may be used with lower headlamp beams as specified in subsection 2 of section 39-21-20.

Auxiliary passing lamps. Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two auxiliary passing lamps mounted on the front at a height not less than twenty-four inches [60.96 centimeters] nor more than forty-two inches [106.68 centimeters] above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands. The provisions of section 39-21-20 apply to any combination of headlamps and auxiliary passing lamps.

Auxiliary driving lamps. Any motor vehicle may be equipped with not to exceed two auxiliary driving lamps. Any auxiliary driving lamp mounted at a height of less than sixteen inches [40.64 centimeters] or more than forty-two inches [106.68 centimeters] above the level surface upon which the vehicle stands may not be lighted when the vehicle is used upon a highway. The provisions of section 39-21-20 apply to any combination of headlamps and auxiliary driving lamps.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, §§ 13, 14.

39-21-18.
Audible and visual signals on vehicle.

Every authorized emergency vehicle must, in addition to any other equipment and distinctive markings required by this chapter, be equipped with a siren, exhaust whistle, or bell capable of causing a minimum sound intensity level of eighty-five decibels. The siren or signal must be mounted outside of the vehicle or in front of the radiator.

Any authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with safety strobe lights.

A police vehicle when used as an authorized emergency vehicle may be equipped with alternately flashing red lights specified herein and a vehicle designated for the use of the adjutant general or the assistant adjutant general may be equipped with a siren, exhaust whistle, or bell specified herein.

Every schoolbus, except vehicles with a seating capacity of less than sixteen students, must be equipped with:

Signal lamps mounted as high and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, which must be capable of displaying to the front two alternately flashing red lights located at the same level and to the rear two alternately flashing red lights located at the same level, and these lights must have sufficient intensity to be visible at five hundred feet [152.4 meters] in normal sunlight;

A stop sign on a control arm that can be activated by the bus driver. The stop sign on the control arm must be located on the left side of the bus, be equipped with a flashing red light, and when activated, extend out from the bus at approximately a ninety-degree angle; and

Safety strobe lights if the schoolbus was manufactured after July 31, 1998. Older schoolbuses may have safety strobe lights installed.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1965, ch. 261, § 2; 1975, ch. 148, § 2; 1987, ch. 473, § 2; 1997, ch. 341, § 2.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter 473, S.L. 1987, provides that the act does not require the installation of stop signs on control arms on schoolbuses in use before July 1, 1988.

39-21-18.1.
Flashing signals on rural mail vehicle — Standards.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it is lawful for any vehicle regularly used as a rural mail delivery vehicle to display two simultaneously flashing amber lamps mounted on top of such vehicle while it is being used to deliver mail. The light assembly must consist of two lamps mounted on top of the vehicle with one lamp being as near as is practicable to each side of the vehicle, displaying an amber light not less than four inches [10.16 centimeters] in diameter and visible under normal atmospheric conditions for a distance of at least five hundred feet [152.4 meters] to the front and to the rear of such vehicle. The lamp assembly must include a sign at least seven inches [17.78 centimeters] in height containing the words “U.S. MAIL” in black letters not less than four inches [10.16 centimeters] in height and of not less than three-quarters of an inch [1.905 centimeters] in width of stroke, upon a white background. The sign must be constructed so as to permit folding down out of the line of vision when not in use. The lamps must be equipped with a device to cause them to flash on and off, and such lamps must be so wired as to cause both lamps to flash simultaneously. In lieu of the light assembly permitted by this section, a vehicle may display one revolving amber light placed on top of the vehicle and accompanied by a sign placed on the rear of the vehicle and containing the words “U.S. MAIL”. The light and sign must comply with the requirements applicable to the amber lights and sign used with a light assembly permitted by this section. Amber lights permitted by this section may only be operated for the purpose of discharging official duties and must not be in operation except during the actual performance of duty delivering mail.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 284, § 1; 1991, ch. 430, § 1.

39-21-19.
Signal lamps and signal devices.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped and when required under this chapter must be equipped with a stop lamp or lamps on the rear of the vehicle which shall display a red light visible from a distance of not less than three hundred feet [91.44 meters] to the rear in normal sunlight, and which shall be actuated upon application of the service (foot) brake, and which may, but need not, be incorporated with one or more other rear lamps.

Any motor vehicle may be equipped and when required under this chapter must be equipped with lamps showing to the front and rear for the purpose of indicating an intention to turn either to the right or left. The lamps showing to the front must be located on the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable and when in use display a white or amber light, or any shade of color between white and amber, visible from a distance of not less than three hundred feet [91.44 meters] to the front in normal sunlight, and the lamps showing to the rear must be located at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable and when in use display a red or amber light, or any shade of color between red and amber, visible from a distance of not less than three hundred feet [91.44 meters] to the rear in normal sunlight. Any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles eighty inches [20.32 decimeters] or more in overall width, and manufactured or assembled after January 1964, must be equipped with the lamps required by this subsection mounted and spaced in the same manner but visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] to the front and rear in normal sunlight. When actuated the lamps must indicate the intended direction of turning by flashing the lights showing to the front and rear on the side toward which the turn is made. Turn signal lamps may, but need not, be incorporated in other lamps on the vehicle.

No stop lamp or signal lamp may project a glaring light.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 15.

39-21-19.1.
Vehicular hazard warning signals.

Any vehicle may be equipped with lamps for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing.

After January 1, 1980, every bus, truck, truck tractor, trailer, semitrailer, or pole trailer eighty inches [20.32 decimeters] or more in overall width or thirty feet [9.14 meters] or more in overall length must be equipped with lamps meeting the requirements of this section.

Vehicular hazard warning signal lamps used to display warning to the front must be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and must display simultaneously flashing white or amber lights, or any shade of color between white and amber. The lamps used to display warning to the rear must be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and must show simultaneously flashing amber or red lights, or any shade of color between amber and red. These warning lights must be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] in normal sunlight.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 431, § 16.

39-21-20.
Multiple-beam road-lighting equipment.

Except as hereinafter provided, the headlamps or the auxiliary driving lamp or the auxiliary passing lamp or combination thereof on motor vehicles must be so arranged that the driver may select at will between distributions of light projected to different elevations and these lamps may, in addition, be so arranged that selection can be made automatically, subject to the following limitations:

There must be an uppermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least four hundred fifty feet [137.16 meters] ahead for all conditions of loading.

There must be a lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least one hundred fifty feet [45.72 meters] ahead; and on a straight level road under any condition of loading none of the high-intensity portion of the beam may be directed to strike the eyes of an approaching driver.

Every new motor vehicle, registered in this state, which has multiple-beam road-lighting equipment must be equipped with a beam indicator, which must be lighted whenever the uppermost distribution of light from the headlamps is in use, and may not otherwise be lighted. The indicator must be so designed and located that when lighted it will be readily visible without glare to the driver of the vehicle so equipped.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 17.

39-21-21.
Use of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment.

Whenever a motor vehicle is being operated on a roadway or shoulder adjacent thereto during the times specified in section 39-21-01, the driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

Whenever a driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred feet [152.4 meters], such driver shall use a distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam, specified in subsection 2 of section 39-21-20 must be deemed to avoid glare at all times, regardless of road contour and loading.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle follows another vehicle within three hundred feet [91.44 meters] to the rear, the driver shall use a distribution of light permissible under this chapter other than the uppermost distribution of light specified in subsection 1 of section 39-21-20.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 18.

39-21-22.
Single-beam road-lighting equipment.

Headlamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light are permitted on motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to one year after July 1, 1963, in lieu of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment herein specified if the single distribution of light complies with the following requirements and limitations:

The headlamps must be so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high-intensity portion of the light shall at a distance of twenty-five feet [7.62 meters] ahead project higher than a level of five inches [12.7 centimeters] below the level of the center of the lamp from which it comes, and in no case higher than forty-two inches [106.68 centimeters] above the level on which the vehicle stands at a distance of seventy-five feet [22.86 meters] ahead.

The intensity must be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least two hundred feet [60.96 meters].

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-23.
Lighting equipment on motor-driven cycles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 431, § 37.

39-21-24.
Arrest for improperly adjusted headlamps or improper bulbs — Certificate of conformance a defense.

The driver of any motor vehicle equipped with approved headlamps, auxiliary driving lamps, rear lamps, or signal lamps who is arrested upon the charge that such lamps are adjusted improperly or are equipped with bulbs of a candle power not approved for use therewith, must be allowed forty-eight hours within which to bring such lamps into conformance with the requirements of this chapter. It is a defense to any such charge that the person arrested produces in court or submits to the state’s attorney a certificate showing that within forty-eight hours after such arrest such lamps have been made to conform with the requirements of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-25.
Number of driving lamps required or permitted.

At all times specified in section 39-21-01 at least two lighted lamps must be displayed, one on each side at the front of every motor vehicle, except when a vehicle is parked subject to the regulations governing lights on parked vehicles.

Whenever a motor vehicle equipped with headlamps as herein required is also equipped with any auxiliary lamps or a spot lamp or any other lamp on the front thereof projecting a beam of intensity greater than three hundred candlepower, not more than a total of four of any such lamps on the front of a vehicle may be lighted at any one time when upon a highway.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1979, ch. 431, § 19.

39-21-26.
Special restrictions on lamps.

Any lighted lamp or illuminating device upon a motor vehicle, other than headlamps, spot lamps, auxiliary lamps, flashing turn signals, emergency vehicle warning lamps and schoolbus warning lamps, which projects a beam of light of an intensity greater than three hundred candlepower must be so directed that no part of the high-intensity portion of the beam will strike the level of the roadway on which the vehicle stands at a distance of more than seventy-five feet [22.86 meters] from the vehicle.

No person may drive or move any vehicle or equipment upon any highway with any lamp or device thereon displaying a red or green light visible from directly in front of the center thereof. This section does not apply to any vehicle upon which a red light visible from the front is expressly authorized or required by this chapter.

Flashing lights are prohibited except on an authorized emergency vehicle, schoolbus, snow-removal equipment or on any vehicle as a means of indicating a right or left turn, or the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring unusual care in approaching, overtaking, or passing.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19.

39-21-27.
Special lighting and warning equipment on schoolbuses.

The superintendent of public instruction, in cooperation with the director, is authorized to adopt standards and specifications applicable to lighting equipment and special warning devices, including the stop sign on a control arm specified in section 39-21-18, to be carried by schoolbuses and other vehicles transporting children to school for compensation, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, but supplemental thereto. The standards and specifications must correlate with and, so far as possible, conform to the specifications then current as approved by the society of automotive engineers.

It is unlawful to operate any flashing warning signal light or the stop sign on the control arm specified in section 39-21-18 on a schoolbus except when the schoolbus is stopped on a highway for the purpose of permitting schoolchildren to board or alight from the schoolbus.

Schoolbuses equipped with safety strobe lights pursuant to subsection 4 of section 39-21-18 must have the safety strobe light in operation whenever the schoolbus is being operated upon a highway for purposes of transporting children either to or from school or for a school-sanctioned activity. It is unlawful to operate a safety strobe light on a schoolbus when the schoolbus is used for any other purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1987, ch. 473, § 3; 1997, ch. 341, § 3.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter 473, S.L. 1987, provides that the act does not require the installation of stop signs on control arms on schoolbuses in use before July 1, 1988.

39-21-27.1.
Schoolbus standards — Equipment and color regulations.

Only motor vehicles which have been designed by the manufacturer for the purpose of carrying passengers may be used as schoolbuses. The superintendent of public instruction may adopt reasonable regulations, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, relating to the construction, design, operation, equipment, and color of schoolbuses and shall prepare and publish standards for North Dakota schoolbuses which must set forth the regulations. The superintendent of public instruction may issue an order prohibiting the operation on public streets, highways, and elsewhere of any schoolbus which does not comply with the regulations, and school districts operating buses which do not meet the regulations will not be eligible to receive state reimbursement for vehicular transportation. If a schoolbus is purchased for a purpose or purposes other than the public transport of schoolchildren, the purchaser shall change the color of the vehicle and deactivate or remove the warning signal lights and the stop sign on the control arm.

Highway patrol officers and all peace officers are authorized to make necessary investigations relating to compliance with the regulations adopted by the superintendent of public instruction and to make reports of their findings to the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1975, ch. 360, § 1; 1987, ch. 473, § 4.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter 473, S.L. 1987, provides that the act does not require the installation of stop signs on control arms on schoolbuses in use before July 1, 1988.